Washington statutes.
RCW 43.334.010

Department created—Definitions.

(1) There is created a department of state government to be known as the department of archaeology and historic preservation. The department is vested with all powers and duties transferred to it under this chapter and such other powers and duties as may be authorized by law.

(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(a) "Department" means the department of archaeology and historic preservation.

(b) "Director" means the director of the department of archaeology and historic preservation.

[ 2005 c 333 s 1.]